Massachusetts, session 194th, H2216.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 72BB of chapter 111 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended, by inserting at the end of subsection (b), the following:
“for the purposes of this section, a psychotropic is any drug that affects brain activities
associated with mental processes and behavior” The relevant drug categories are antipsychotics,
antidepressants, anxiolytics, and depressants. Additional drugs, such as anticonvulsants, may
also be included in this definition, especially if these medications are administered for the same
reason as a psychotropic medication.
SECTION 2. Said section 72BB of chapter 111, is hereby further amended after
subsection (c ), the following additional subsections:
(d) Failure of a nursing home to submit the Nursing Home (NH) Antipsychotic
Medication Measures report as required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid shall
of 2

constitute a violation of this section, that shall be punishable by a monetary penalty as
established by the department; and any pattern of failure to submit said reports may be
punishable by suspension of new admissions to such nursing home.
(e ) Each quarterly report of the Nursing Home (NH) Antipsychotic Medication Measures
report as required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid shall, at the time of submission be
prominently posted on the department website and the website of the respective nursing home as
public information.
(f) The care plan of any resident to whom a psychotropic is administered, shall list the
name and license number of the authorized prescriber, the date of evaluation documenting the
need for the prescription, the reasons for prescribing said psychotropic, and shall certify that the
resident or guardian, if any, has given informed consent, such written declaration shall be made
under the penalties of perjury.
of 2